src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
sagrēkot+V:sagrēko IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
aizauļot+V:aizauļo IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
ieziemot+V:ieziemo TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
jūsot+V:jūso TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
dragāt+V:dragā TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
mantot+V:manto TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
stimulēt+V:stimulē TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
orķestrēt+V:orķestrē TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
blāvot+V:blāvo IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
klusēt+V:klusē IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
ogot+V:ogo IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
spīguļot+V:spīguļo IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
apdūlēt+V:apdūlē IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
deformēt+V:deformē TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
flankēt:flankē V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
ieintriģēt:ieintriģē V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
ierūsēt+V:ierūsē IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
iniciēt:iniciē V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
izsargāt:izsargā V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
izstīdzēt+V:izstīdzē TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
merserizēt:merserizē V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
nogulsnēt:nogulsnē V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
notamborēt:notamborē V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
penterēt+V:penterē IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
pieairēt:pieairē V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
piedrukāt+V:piedrukā TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
saduzēt:saduzē V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
saskrāpēt+V:saskrāpē TV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
stampāt:stampā V-_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
īgņāt+V:īgņā IV_16_2-Nē_  "" ;
pārēdināt+V:pārēdinā TV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
kriukšķināt+V:kriukšķinā TV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
nospodrināt+V:nospodrinā TV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
šmīkstināt+V:šmīkstinā TV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
atsvešināt+V:atsvešinā TV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
klusināt+V:klusinā TV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
pūtināt+V:pūtinā TV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
šļakstīt+V:šļakstī TV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
dipēt+V:dipē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
dzirkstēt+V:dzirkstē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
krakšķēt+V:krakšķē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
ņudzēt+V:ņudzē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
ritēt+V:ritē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
strinkšķēt+V:strinkšķē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
tupēt+V:tupē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
apputēt:apputē V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
atrežģīt:atrežģī V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
iedauzīt:iedauzī V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
izbikstīt:izbikstī V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
izraustīt:izraustī V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
kutēt:kutē V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
nosprakšķēt:nosprakšķē V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
pavizēt:pavizē V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
pāršļakstēt:pāršļakstē V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
sašķobīt:sašķobī V-_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
saķert+V:saķer TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
bērt+V:bēr TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
dīkt+V:dīk IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
apēst+V:apēd TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
sakārt+V:sakār TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
aplauzt+V:aplauz TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
līgt+V:līg TV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
uzņemt+V:uzņem TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
rakt+V:rak TV_15_RAKT  "" ;
izrakt+V:izrak TV_15_RAKT  "" ;
sarakt+V:sarak TV_15_RAKT  "" ;
parakt+V:parak TV_15_RAKT  "" ;
norakt+V:norak TV_15_RAKT  "" ;
sēkt+V:sēk IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
piesiet+V:piesie TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
svērt+V:svēr TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
trīt+V:trī TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
žņaugt+V:žņaug TV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
iztikt+V:iztik IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
apslimt+V:apslim IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
nogrimt+V:nogrim IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
grūt+V:grū IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
klupt+V:klup IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
nokvēpt+V:nokvēp IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
ļimt+V:ļim IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
samilzt+V:samilz IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
nīkt+V:nīk IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
uzplaukt+V:uzplauk IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
saplīst+V:saplīs IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
salabt+V:salab IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
sasirgt+V:sasirg IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
atskurbt+V:atskurb IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
saspringt+V:saspring IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
sprūst+V:sprūd IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
tūkt+V:tūk IV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
pienākt+V:pienāk IV_15_1-Nē_  "" ;
alkt+V:alk TV_15_5_SALT  "" ;
gainīt+V:gainī TV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
pastāvēt+V:pastāvē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
pēkšķēt+V:pēkšķē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
vēkšķēt+V:vēkšķē IV_17_3-Nē_  "" ;
iesniegties+V:iesnieg TV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
aizsegties+V:aizseg IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
beigties+V:beig IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
griezties+V:griez IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
lūgties+V:lūg IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
prasties+V:pras IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
sniegties+V:snieg IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
tērpties+V:tērp IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
virties+V:vir IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
nākties+V:nāk IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
iesacīties+V:iesacī IV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
teikt+V:teik TV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
pārteikt+V:pārteik TV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
izdoties+V:izdo TV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
nodoties+V:nodo TV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
justies+V:jus TV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
dergties+V:derg TV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
ietērpties:ietērp TV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
ļauties+V:ļau TV_18_1-REFL_  "" ;
